Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 7 Arrest

12-7-1.
Temporary detention of suspects.

A peace officer may detain any person abroad whom he or she has reason to suspect is committing, has committed, or is about to commit a crime, and may demand of the person his or her name, address, business abroad, and destination; and any person who fails to identify himself or herself and explain his or her actions to the satisfaction of the peace officer may be further detained and further questioned and investigated by any peace officer; provided, in no case shall the total period of the detention exceed two (2) hours, and the detention shall not be recorded as an arrest in any official record. At the end of the detention period the person so detained shall be released unless arrested and charged with a crime.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 68; P.L. 1941, ch. 982, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-1

.

12-7-2.
Search of detained person for weapons.

A peace officer may search for a dangerous weapon any person he or she is questioning or about to question concerning any crime or suspected crime, whenever the officer reasonably believes that he or she is in danger from the person carrying a weapon, and if the person is carrying a dangerous weapon, an officer may take and keep it until the completion of questioning, when he or she shall either return it or arrest the person.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 68; P.L. 1941, ch. 982, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-2

.

12-7-3.
Arrest without warrant for misdemeanor or petty misdemeanor.

A peace officer may, without a warrant, arrest a person if the officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person is committing or has committed a misdemeanor or a petty misdemeanor, and the officer has reasonable ground to believe that person cannot be arrested later or may cause injury to himself or herself or others or loss or damage to property unless immediately arrested.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 75; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 75; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 68; P.L. 1941, ch. 982, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-3

; P.L. 1977, ch. 71, § 1.

12-7-4.
Arrest without warrant for felony.

A peace officer may, without a warrant, arrest a person for a felony, whenever:

The officer has reasonable ground to believe that a felony has been or is being committed and that the person to be arrested has committed or is committing it.

The person to be arrested in fact has committed or is committing a felony; and in that case it shall be immaterial that the officer did not believe him or her guilty or on unreasonable ground entertained belief in his or her guilt.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 75; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 75; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 68; P.L. 1941, ch. 982, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-4

.

12-7-5.
Arrest on improper ground.

If a lawful cause of arrest exists, the arrest shall be lawful even though the officer made the arrest on an improper ground.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 68; P.L. 1941, ch. 982, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-5

.

12-7-6.
Arrest on warrant not in possession of arresting officer.

A peace officer may, without having a warrant in his or her possession, arrest any person for whose arrest a warrant has been issued, but after arrest, the warrant shall be shown to him or her as soon as practicable.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 75; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 75; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 68; P.L. 1941, ch. 982, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-6

.

12-7-7.
Methods of arrest.

An arrest is made by the restraint of the person to be arrested or by his or her submission of his or her person to the custody of the person making the arrest.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 68; P.L. 1941, ch. 982, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-7

.

12-7-8.
Restraint and force used.

No greater restraint than is necessary shall be used for the detention of any person, and no unnecessary or unreasonable force shall be used in making an arrest.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 68; P.L. 1941, ch. 982, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-8

.

12-7-9.
Conditions justifying force dangerous to life.

A police officer may use force dangerous to human life to make a lawful arrest for committing or attempting to commit a felony, whenever he or she reasonably believes that force dangerous to human life is necessary to effect the arrest and that the person to be arrested is aware that a peace officer is attempting to arrest him or her.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 68; P.L. 1941, ch. 982, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-9

.

12-7-10.
Resisting legal or illegal arrest.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use force or any weapon in resisting a legal or an illegal arrest by a peace officer, if the person has reasonable ground to believe that he or she is being arrested and that the arrest is being made by a peace officer.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 68; P.L. 1941, ch. 982, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-10

; P.L. 1980, ch. 351, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 114, § 1.

12-7-11.
Summons.

In any case in which a peace officer has reasonable grounds to believe that a person has committed or is committing a misdemeanor, he or she may issue a summons to the person substantially in the following form:

Willful failure to appear in answer to this summons may be punished by a fine of not over fifty dollars ($50.00) or imprisonment for not over fifteen (15) days.

(Summons) STATE OF RHODE ISLAND To You are hereby summoned to appear before a judge of the District Court for the Division, located at in the (City)(Town) of , in the State of Rhode Island, on the day of , 20 at o'clock m., to answer to a complaint charging you with the crime of in violation of [statute, ordinance, etc.] If you fail to appear and answer, a warrant will issue for your arrest. Dated at the day of 20 Title Department

Click to view

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 68; P.L. 1941, ch. 982, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-11

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 16; P.L. 1977, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 12, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 12, effective June 23, 2021.

12-7-12.
Release of arrested person by officer.

The officer in charge of any police station shall consider the release of any person in his or her station who has been arrested without a warrant:

Without requiring the person to appear in court, when the officer is satisfied that there is no ground for making criminal complaint against the person or when the person has been arrested for drunkenness but in the judgment of the officer need not be brought before a magistrate; or

If the arrest is for a misdemeanor, upon that person signing an agreement to appear in court at a designated time.

Any officer with custody of a person who has been arrested or detained without a warrant may recognize that the person suffers from a serious mental illness and may release and refer the person to the nearest appropriate inpatient mental health facility or outpatient treatment program.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 75; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 75; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 68; P.L. 1941, ch. 982, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-12

; P.L. 2017, ch. 342, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 353, § 2.

12-7-13.
Repealed.

12-7-14.
Punitive damages for false arrest or imprisonment.

In an action for false arrest or false imprisonment, the plaintiff, if successful, may be awarded punitive damages in addition to compensatory damages.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 68; P.L. 1941, ch. 982, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-14

.

12-7-15.
Severability.

If any part of §§

12-7-1

—

12-7-14

is for any reason declared void, its invalidity shall not affect the remaining portions of those sections.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 68; P.L. 1941, ch. 982, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-15

.

12-7-16.
Arrest or seizure after commission of offense.

The authority given to any one to arrest any person or seize anything, while the person is actually engaged or the thing is actually used or employed in the commission of any offense, shall not be so construed as to prevent, if not so arrested or seized, the arrest of the person or the seizure of the thing after the commission of the offense, upon due process of law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 64; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 64; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 76; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 76; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 69; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-16

.

12-7-17.
Arrest of escapees and parole violators without warrant.

The director of the department of corrections, the warden of the adult correctional institutions, any superintendent or employees connected with any institution under the management and control of the department of corrections, or any police officer or town constable, may arrest, without a warrant, any person who has escaped from any institution, or who, being absent from the institution on parole, has violated the conditions of the parole, for the purpose of returning the person to the institution from which the escape was made or from which the parole was granted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2208, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 23; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-7-17

; P.L. 1973, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 22; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 22.

12-7-18.
Temporary detention powers of National Guard.

A National Guard member of the rank of sergeant or higher who is on emergency state duty pursuant to the call of the governor may detain any person abroad who he or she has reason to suspect is committing, has committed, or is about to commit a crime, and may demand of the person his or her name, address, business abroad, and destination; and any person who fails to identify himself or herself and explain his or her actions to the satisfaction of the national guard member may be further detained and further questioned and investigated by the peace officer; provided, in no case shall the total period of the detention exceed two (2) hours, and the detention shall not be recorded as an arrest in any official record. At the end of the detention period the person so detained shall be released unless arrested and charged with a crime.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 120, § 1.

12-7-19.
Arrest after close pursuit by officers from cities or towns.

Any member of a duly organized municipal peace unit of another city or town of the state who enters any city or town in close pursuit and continues within any city or town in such close pursuit of a person in order to stop him or her for a suspected violation of any provision of the motor vehicle code committed in the other city or town, shall be vested with all of the same authority as a member of a duly organized municipal peace unit of the city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 469, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 474, § 1.

12-7-20.
Right to use telephone for call to attorney — Bail bondsperson.

Any person arrested under the provisions of this chapter shall be afforded, as soon after being detained as practicable, not to exceed one hour from the time of detention, the opportunity to make use of a telephone for the purpose of securing an attorney or arranging for bail; provided, that whenever a person who has been detained for an alleged violation of the law relating to drunk driving must be immediately transported to a medical facility for treatment, he or she shall be afforded the use of a telephone as soon as practicable, which may exceed one hour from the time of detention. The telephone calls afforded by this section shall be carried out in such a manner as to provide confidentiality between the arrestee and the recipient of the call.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 122 § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 242, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 1.

12-7-21.
“Peace officer” defined.

“Peace officer,” as used within this chapter, means the following individuals or members of:

Rhode Island state police;

Any member of a municipal or local police department;

Rhode Island airport corporation police;

Rhode Island park police;

Rhode Island capitol police;

Rhode Island conservation officers;

Rhode Island department of environmental management officers;

Rhode Island fire marshals;

Brown University police officers;

University of Rhode Island campus police officers;

Rhode Island College campus security;

Campus security at the Community College of Rhode Island;

Rhode Island sheriff’s department;

The investigators of the department of attorney general appointed pursuant to §

42-9-8.1

;

Any federal law enforcement officer;

Correctional investigators, chief inspector and inspectors within the office of inspections, and correctional officers of the Rhode Island department of corrections;

The witness protection coordinator of the department of attorney general;

The warden, associate wardens, majors, captains, lieutenants, sergeants, correctional officers and investigators employed by a project operated by a municipal detention facility corporation, including, but not limited to, the Donald W. Wyatt Detention Facility; provided, such parties listed in this subsection (18) herein shall be deemed to be peace officers while in performance of their duties for the municipal detention facility only, and shall not be deemed to be peace officers at any time when they are not in performance of said duties;

Retired non-permanent sworn members of any municipal police department shall be deemed to be peace officers only while in the performance of their duties for any municipal police department, and shall be permitted to carry their firearm while in the performance of their duties for the municipal police department, and shall be subject to in-service training requirements of title 42, chapter 28;

Auto theft investigators appointed pursuant to §

31-50-1

;

Providence fire department arson investigators; provided, that the arson investigator is a graduate of a police-training academy; and

Rhode Island School of Design police officers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 245, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 286, § 4; P.L. 1993, ch. 273, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 423, § 4; P.L. 1998, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 290, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 263, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 392, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 7, § 6; P.L. 2011, ch. 287, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 400, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 164, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 234, § 3; P.L. 2022, ch. 378, § 2, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 379, § 2, effective June 29, 2022.

12-7-22.
Electronic recording of custodial interrogations task force.

In order to:

Minimize the likelihood of a wrongful conviction caused by a false confession; and

Further improve the already high quality of criminal justice in our state, the general assembly creates a taskforce to investigate and develop policies and procedures for electronically recording custodial interrogations in their entirety.

The task force shall be comprised of the following or their designees:

Attorney general;

Public defender;

Superintendent of the Rhode Island state police;

President of the Rhode Island Police Chiefs’ Association;

Head of the municipal police training academy;

President of the Rhode Island Bar Association;

President of the Rhode Island Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers;

Public safety commissioner of the city of Providence;

Chief of police of a department with less than forty-five (45) sworn officers and that does not currently have an established policy concerning the electronic recording of custodial interrogations, to be agreed upon by the task force;

Chief of police of a department (other than one separately designated herein) that already has established a policy concerning the regular, electronic recording of custodial interrogations, to be agreed upon by the task force; and

Executive director of the Rhode Island commission for human rights.

The attorney general and public defender shall serve as co-chairpersons of the task force and have the authority to call for and designate the time and place of meetings. A majority of members shall constitute a quorum, but a lesser number may hold meetings. The task force shall act only on an affirmative vote of a majority of those voting. All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish such advice and information, documentary and otherwise, to the task force and its agents as is deemed necessary or desirable by the task force to facilitate the purposes of this section.

The task force, in consultation with whatever experts it may deem appropriate, shall study and make recommendations concerning the establishment of a statewide law enforcement practice of electronically recording custodial interrogations in their entirety. In so doing, the task force shall consider, but not be limited to, the following:

Models from other federal and state jurisdictions;

Current policies, procedures, and practices of law enforcement statewide;

Types of crimes, investigations, and settings where custodial interrogations should be electronically recorded;

Whether custodial interrogations should be electronically recorded using audio-visual or strictly audio recording;

Whether custodial interrogations should be electronically recorded with or without the knowledge of the suspect;

Appropriate procedures to be followed when the suspect refuses to be, or exigent circumstances otherwise prevent, the electronic recording of the custodial interrogation;

How to most effectively record interrogations in view of an individual police department’s fiscal, staffing, and space constraints;

Appropriate policies and procedures concerning the transcription of the electronic recordings resulting from custodial interrogation;

Appropriate policies and procedures concerning the long-term preservation and storage of the electronic recordings resulting from custodial interrogation; and

The desirability of written policies, procedures, training, and/or additional legislation regarding the electronic recording of custodial interrogations in their entirety statewide.

The task force shall submit a report on its recommendations concerning the investigation and development of policies and procedures for electronically recording custodial interrogations in their entirety. This report shall be presented to the governor, the chief justice of the Rhode Island supreme court, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the chairpersons of the judiciary committees of both the house of representatives and the senate no later than February 1, 2012. Thereafter, the task force shall meet periodically in order to assess the impact of the recommendations it has made; conduct further research in the area of the electronic recording of custodial interrogations; assess the implementation of written policies in these areas by Rhode Island law enforcement agencies; and determine whether or not any additional legislation regarding the electronic recording of custodial interrogations in their entirety statewide is required. Said meetings shall be called by agreement of the attorney general and public defender. A supplemental report from the task force shall be delivered in the same manner as its initial report and not later than December 31, 2014.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 43, § 1.